District of Columbia statutes.
47-1533

Appeal from assessment or denial of claim for refund.

Any person aggrieved by any assessment of a deficiency in tax and any person aggrieved by the denial of a claim for refund may, within 6 months from the date of the assessment of the deficiency or from the date of the denial of a claim for refund, as the case may be, appeal to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in the same manner and to the same extent as set forth in §§ 47-3303, 47-3304, 47-3306, 47-3307, and 47-3308.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 14, 34 DCR 850
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1533.